apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_det_pr_prn.ca.dix
<pardef n="/per__pr"><!--MG: Inclou contracció amb articles -->
      <e r="LR"> 
        <p>
          <l>per</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
      <e r="RL"> 
        <p>
          <l><a/>per</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>  
      <e r="LR"> 
        <p>
          <l>pel</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>     
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pels</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>  
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pels<b/>meus</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>meu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pel<b/>meu</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>meu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
 
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pels<b/>teus</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>teu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pel<b/>teu</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>teu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
    
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pels<b/>seus</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>seu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pel<b/>seu</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>seu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
    
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pels<b/>nostres</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>nostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pel<b/>nostre</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>nostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pels<b/>vostres</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>vostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pel<b/>vostre</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>vostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pels<b/>meus</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>meu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pel<b/>meu</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>meu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>  
     
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pels<b/>teus</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>teu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pel<b/>teu</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>teu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
   
     
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pels<b/>seus</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>seu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pel<b/>seu</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>seu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
   
          
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pels<b/>nostres</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>nostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pel<b/>nostre</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>nostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>   
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pels<b/>vostres</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>vostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pel<b/>vostre</l>
          <r>per<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>vostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ambd/ós__det">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ós</l>
          <r>ós<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ues</l>
          <r>ós<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>ós</l>
          <r>ós<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>ues</l>
          <r>ós<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="tot/s_dos__det">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s<b/>dos</l>
          <r>s<b/>dos<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es<b/>dues</l>
          <r>s<b/>dos<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



<pardef n="/el__det">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les</l>
          <r>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>la</l>
          <r>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>els</l>
          <r>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>els</l>
          <r>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



 <pardef n="aquest__det">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="aquell__det">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<e lm="ambdós"><i>ambd</i><par n="ambd/ós__det"/></e>
<e lm="aquell"><i>aquell</i><par n="aquell__det"/></e>
<e lm="aquest"><i>aquest</i><par n="aquest__det"/></e>
<e lm="el"><par n="/el__det"/></e>
<e lm="tots dos"><i>tot</i><par n="tot/s_dos__det"/></e>
<e lm="per"><par n="/per__pr"/></e>
